Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.120

Termination of referral—Judgment—Review of referee's decision.

(1) Upon receipt by the clerk of the court of the final written report filed under RCW 4.48.110, the referral of the action shall terminate and the presiding judge of the superior court shall order the judgment contained in the report entered as the judgment of the court in the action. Subsequent motions and other post trial proceedings in the action may be conducted and disposed of by the referee upon order of the presiding judge, in the discretion of the presiding judge, or may otherwise be assigned by the presiding judge.

(2) The decision of a referee entered as provided in this section may be reviewed in the same manner as if the decision was made by the court.

[ 1984 c 258 s 522.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.